California statutes. Education Code
(b) (1) Active and retired employees, including future employees, of the district or districts who otherwise would be members of the plan, persons who are members of the district’s retirement salary plan, and persons who were employees on June 30, 1957, and who attained age 65 years or over during the 12 months immediately preceding July 1, 1957, other than teachers and persons employed in a status requisite for membership in the State Teachers’ Retirement System or who were so employed prior to retirement, shall be made members and beneficiaries, respectively, of the Public Employees’ Retirement System according to the provisions of Part 3 (commencing with Section 20000) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, including transfer to the system of the accumulated contributions of the members, together with the other assets of the plan as may be determined. However, the total of the other assets transferred shall not be greater than the portion of the reserves of the plan that is allocable to the active and retired employees, as determined by actuarial valuation. In the valuation the portion of the reserves allocable to the active and retired employees proposed to be transferred shall be determined as an amount which bears the same ratio to the total reserves under the plan as the liabilities under the plan on account of the active and retired employees bear to the total liabilities under the plan on account of all active and retired employees under the plan. On the effective date of the contract making the active employees members of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, the employees shall cease to be members of the plan, and neither they nor retired persons who are made beneficiaries of the state system, shall be paid or have any right to any allowance or other benefit under the plan for time beginning with the effective date.

(2) With respect to persons who are members of the plan at the transfer, it shall be provided in the contract making the employees members of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, that their respective rates of contribution under the plan shall be based on the age at the nearest birthday at July 1, 1944, or at the respective later effective dates of their membership in the plan, all instead of the age at the nearest birthday at the effective date of membership in the employees’ system.

(3) Each employee of the district or districts who is included in the contract, but who during all or part of his or her employment in a status requisite for membership in the plan was not a member thereof, because of his or her election under an available option, or who, while employed in a status not requisite for membership in the plan, was a member of the State Teachers’ Retirement System and was contributing to that system, or who did not redeposit upon reentry into membership contributions previously withdrawn, shall have the right to elect by written document filed with the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, at any time within 90 days after the date upon which the notice of the right to make the election is mailed by the system either to the member’s latest address on file in the office of the system, or to the office of the governing board of the district or districts, and prior to the date of retirement, to contribute to the system, subject to minimum payments fixed by the board of administration, and in one or more sums, or in not to exceed 60 monthly payments, an amount which, when added to his or her accumulated contributions, including interest, transferred as required in paragraph (1), will make a total amount equal to the accumulated contributions, including interest, that would have been credited to him or her in the plan, if he or she had never elected not to be a member thereof, or if he or she had been a member of the plan during the time he or she was a member of the State Teachers’ Retirement System and was contributing to the system, or if he or she had redeposited the withdrawn contributions upon reentry, as the case may be. The employee shall pay to the Public Employees’ Retirement System interest on the unpaid balance of the amount payable to the system, beginning with the date of transfer, at the rate of interest currently used from time to time under the system. If the employee elects to make, and makes the contributions, and pays the interest, but not otherwise, he or she shall receive credit under the employees’ system, as state service, for all the service rendered while he or she was not a member of the plan, because of his or her optional exclusion, or for service rendered while he or she was contributing to the State Teachers’ Retirement System, provided the service is no longer credited under the teachers’ system, or for all service upon which the withdrawn contributions were based, and for the purpose of paragraph (2) shall be considered as a member of the plan at the transfer and from November 1, 1937, or later beginning date of the service. Regardless of whether the contributions are made, the employee shall receive credit for service with which he or she was credited or would have been credited if he or she had been a member, as prior service under the plan. The contributions under this paragraph shall be added to and administered in the same manner as the contributions transferred under paragraph (1).

(4) Service rendered by active employees who are made members of the Public Employees’ Retirement System prior to or after the assumption by the district or districts of the function under which the service was rendered, but prior to the effective date of the contract making active employees members, and the compensation for which was paid wholly or in part from funds other than the funds of the district or districts, shall be credited under the employees’ system, provided the service qualified for credit under the plan.

(5) The contract making the active employees members of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, shall include the employees with respect to service rendered in a status in which they are not eligible for membership in the State Teachers’ Retirement System, as provided in Section 20491 of the Government Code, and also with respect to service rendered in a status in which they are eligible for that membership, but that is no longer credited under the teachers’ retirement system, and the service shall be credited in the manner applicable to service otherwise qualifying for credit.

(6) Retirement allowances being paid under the plan to retired employees of the district or districts, who are made beneficiaries of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, shall be changed by action of the governing board of the district, effective at the transfer, to retirement allowances calculated on the basis of service used in the calculation of the respective allowances under the plan, and average annual salary earnable during the highest three consecutive years of creditable service, calculated according to the methods used at the date of transfer, under the plan in determining salary earnable, but excluding any salary based on overtime as provided in Section 20025.2 of the Government Code, but otherwise according to the formulae under the employees’ system that apply to active employees who are made members of the employees’ system. The changed allowances shall be paid to the beneficiaries for time commencing on the date they are made beneficiaries of the employees’ system. No allowance shall be reduced by the change.

(7) If two or more districts under the control and management of a single governing board are participants in the plan, one contract between the board of administration and the governing board may include all the districts. The governing board may apportion the total contributions required under the contract, among the districts on the basis of total salaries upon which the contributions are computed, and on the basis of other pertinent information.

(8) The contract making these active employees members of the Public Employees’ Retirement System shall provide that the service included in the calculation of the completed years of service as a basis for the portion of the basic death benefit provided in subdivision (b) of Section 21361 of the Government Code for persons who were members of the plan at transfer, shall not be limited to service under the Public Employees’ Retirement System, but instead that service rendered as members of the plan shall also be included.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24811.

If two or more districts have been included in one contract between the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, and the governing board of the districts, as provided in paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 24810, and if, since that inclusion, two or more of the districts have been combined into a unified district, the unified district, by amendment to the contract, may, notwithstanding Section 20580 of the Government Code, be substituted for the districts so combined, and for all purposes of the contract.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24812.

If two districts, one of which is a community college district, have been included in one contract between the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System and the governing board of the districts, as provided in paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 24810, and thereafter members of the governing board of the community college district are precluded by law from serving as members of the governing body of the other district, the contract shall be deemed a separate contract as to each district. The Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System shall determine the accumulated contributions held for or as having been made by each district and its employees, and shall credit the contributions to the respective contracts. Benefits based on all service of an employee to the districts prior to the date upon which employees’ elections to serve the respective districts are effective shall be a liability of the contract of the district employing the person on the effective date. A person retired prior to the effective date shall, for all purposes of this section, be deemed an employee of the district other than the community college district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24813.

(a) The contract executed under Section 24810, and making persons other than teachers and other persons employed in a status requisite for membership in the State Teachers’ Retirement System, who are active or retired members of a district retirement salary plan established under Sections 24800 to 24812, inclusive, members and beneficiaries of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, shall be amended to include as members or beneficiaries, teachers and other persons who were employed in a status requisite for membership in the State Teachers’ Retirement System, who ceased to be members of the plan if it was discontinued, or if the plan was not discontinued, who resign instead of retiring and are refunded their accumulated contributions under that plan, or who retire or have retired under the district plan and relinquish or have relinquished their right to allowances from the plan with credit for service rendered in a status in which they would have been eligible for membership in the Public Employees’ Retirement System, if the district or districts by which they were employed had been participating in that system under Part 3 (commencing with Section 20000) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, but only if the service qualified for credit under the plan and is not credited under any other retirement system.

(b) The service of a person who ceased to be a member, or resigns or has resigned instead of retiring, or who relinquishes or has relinquished, shall be administered under the contract in exactly the same manner as that applied to service of persons who were retired under the local retirement system at the effective date of that contract, and were made beneficiaries, or who were not retired and were made members of the system on that date. The retirement allowances being received by the relinquishing persons, on account of service that would have been credited under the Public Employees’ Retirement System as stated, shall be adjusted in the same manner that allowances were adjusted under paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 24810. Any member who is credited with service in accordance with this section, shall pay to the Public Employees’ Retirement System, at times and in the manner fixed by the board of administration of that system, an amount equal to contributions with interest, that the member received as a refund from the plan, and that were based on service credited, plus interest from the date of refund to the date of the payment, at the interest rate in effect under the system at the date of payment. Contributions required of the district or districts shall be determined by proper valuation, and the contributions set forth in the contract shall be adjusted accordingly.

(c) A retirement allowance based on the credited service shall be payable and retirement shall become effective, under the Public Employees’ Retirement System beginning on the first day of the month next following the effective date of this section, in the case of a person who then is retired under the State Teachers’ Retirement System, or otherwise on the later effective date of the member’s retirement under the teachers’ system. The allowance shall be based on the person’s age when the allowance begins, and on the same average salary as that upon which his or her allowance under the State Teachers’ Retirement System, is based.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 35. Joint District Salary Retirement Plan [24900. - 24944.]



  ARTICLE 1. Establishment of Plan [24900. - 24908.]

24900.

The governing boards of two or more school districts, in none of which the employees are entitled to the benefits of a pension or retirement system maintained by a city, city and county, or county in which the district, or a part thereof, is located, meeting in joint session, may in their discretion, submit to the qualified electors of the districts, and upon petition signed by not less than 10 percent of the qualified electors of each district the governing boards shall submit to the qualified electors of the districts the proposition of establishing a joint plan for a retirement salary to be paid by the districts to all teachers fulfilling the requirements of the plan in the public schools of the districts and to other employees of the districts as the governing boards may determine, or, in the case of a petition, other employees specified in the petition, and to provide, out of funds of the districts, a portion of the cost thereunder, including expenses incident to the administration of the plan.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24901.

The proposition of establishing the plan may be submitted to the electors of the districts at any general or special election called and held in the districts, as the governing boards of the districts may determine. The governing boards of the school districts may order the elections that shall be called and held in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5300) of Part 4.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24902.

The governing boards calling the election shall consolidate the election and submit to the electors of the respective districts on the same day the question of whether a district retirement plan shall be established in the districts. Within the territory affected by the order of consolidation, the election precinct polling places and voting booths shall, in every case, be the same. There shall be only one set of election officers in each precinct. The propositions to be voted upon within the respective districts may be set forth on one ticket or ballot. All proceedings had in the premises shall be recorded in one set of election papers, and the election shall be held in all respects as though there were only one election.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24903.

The election may be consolidated with any other election pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 10400) of Division 10 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

24904.

The election shall be called by posting notices, signed by a majority of the governing board of each district, not less than 10 days before the election. If there is a newspaper of general circulation published in any of the districts, notice shall be published in such a newspaper at least once, and at least 10 days prior to the election.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24905.

In all respects not otherwise specified the election shall be called and held, and returns canvassed and the result announced in the manner provided for the holding of elections for the purpose of authorizing bonds of the school districts, so far as the provisions of the laws are applicable. The governing boards of the school districts in which the election is held shall, for the purposes of this section, be considered as one board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24906.

There shall be printed on the ballots to be used at the election the proposition: “Shall the governing boards of (here insert the names of the districts under the control of the boards submitting the proposition) school districts be authorized to establish a plan for a joint district retirement salary for the teachers and such other employees of the districts as the governing boards or the petition determines.” To the right of or below the proposition to be voted on, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 8.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

24907.

If, at the election, a majority of the voters in each district voting on the proposition cast their ballots in favor of the proposition, the governing boards shall establish a joint district retirement salary plan for the teachers and for such other employees of the districts as the boards or the petition determine.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24908.

If a majority of the votes cast in each district on the proposition is in the negative, the governing boards shall not submit the proposition again within a period of six months after the date of the election.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration of the Plan [24920. - 24944.]

24920.

Every teacher and every other employee of the school districts for which the plan for district retirement is adopted, who is employed by the districts at the time of the adoption of the plan, and who signs an agreement to be subject to the burdens of the district retirement plan, shall be entitled to the benefits and subject to the burdens of the plan and of this chapter. Every teacher employed in the public schools of the districts after the adoption of the provisions of this chapter by the governing boards of the districts, and any other employees the boards or the petition determines, shall be bound by the benefits and burdens of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24921.

Any plan shall not be adopted or established until the governing boards, after any inquiry and hearing they may direct, find that the respective contributions of the teachers and other employees and the districts provided for in the plan, are substantially in accordance with the more recent generally prevailing rates of contributions in public institutions that have established retirement systems, and that the plan is in accordance with sound business practice and with recognized actuarial methods.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24922.

The plan may provide that the retirement salary shall be a stipulated monthly sum, or that all benefits under the retirement feature of the plan shall be based upon the monthly salary for each year of future active service in the district earned by the employee up to the date of retirement and upon the average monthly salary earned by the teacher or other eligible employee during the year immediately preceding the adoption of the plan and the number of years of past active service of the employee in the district, and subject to those provisions made in the plan for minimum benefits. No employee with less than 15 years’ service in the district prior to normal retirement age shall receive the benefit of the minimum. In no instance shall the retirement benefits be based upon or allowed for any amount of salary in excess of the sum of five hundred dollars ($500) per month.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24923.

In lieu of the authorizations or requirements provided for in Sections 24920 and 24922, the plan may provide only that the retirement salary shall be based on service rendered prior to the effective date of the plan or prior to July 1, 1944, and shall be an amount which, when added to the retirement allowance the respective member is entitled to receive under the State Teachers’ Retirement System, shall equal a sum of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) per month and Sections 24920 and 24922 shall not be applicable thereto. The costs of the benefits under such a plan may be met by the contributions of the districts alone, notwithstanding Sections 35161, 35162, Article 1 (commencing with Section 7000) of Chapter 1 of Part 5, Article 2 (commencing with Section 10010) of Chapter 1 of Part 7, Article 1 (commencing with Section 12500) of Chapter 5 of Part 8, this part, Article 5 (commencing with Section 32340) of Chapter 3 of Part 19, and Part 25 (commencing with Section 44000), and only teachers who have credit for service rendered prior to that date shall be subject to the plan.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24924.

(a) A plan established under this chapter that is intended to provide supplemental benefits only on account of service rendered before July 1, 1944, may be discontinued by the governing board of the district, subject to the following conditions:

(1) Notwithstanding Sections 35161, 35162, Article 1 (commencing with Section 7000) of Chapter 1, Article 2 (commencing with Section 10010) of Chapter 1 of Part 7, Article 1 (commencing with Section 12500) of Chapter 5 of Part 8, this part, Article 5 (commencing with Section 32340) of Chapter 3 of Part 19, and Part 25 (commencing with Section 44000), any teacher who is not retired on July 1, 1956, shall be entitled to the contributions made by him or her to the discontinued plan with interest credited in accordance with the rules and regulations of the local retirement plan up to and including June 30, 1957. Likewise, a teacher who retired prior to July 1, 1956, shall be entitled to a refund equal to the actuarial equivalent, at his or her attained age, of the annuity that would have been provided by the total contributions required of the member under the system, based on interest and mortality tables currently in use, less the amount of any contributions remaining unpaid on the date of discontinuance. The amount to which any teacher is entitled under this section shall be paid to him or her within 90 days of his or her request in writing on a form provided by and filed with the local retirement system. All requests shall be filed prior to July 1, 1959.

(2) The district in which the plan is discontinued shall pay monthly to teachers, who were retired prior to the date of the discontinuance, an amount equal to the amount by which the retirement allowance to which any of these retired teachers was entitled under the plan exceeds the increase in the teacher’s retirement allowance under the State Teachers’ Retirement System after the discontinuance. In lieu of the monthly payment, the district may elect to pay in a single sum the amount that shall be the actuarial equivalent to the monthly amount thereafter payable, according to the interest rate and mortality table currently in use under the plan. Payment of the amount shall discharge fully the district’s liability to the teacher under this subdivision. The arrangement under which the amounts are paid by the district shall not be considered to be a local retirement system for the purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 22000) to Chapter 31 (commencing with Section 24600), inclusive, nor shall the amount be taken into account in the calculation of the retirement allowances under the State Teachers’ Retirement System.

(b) Any person who was retired prior to July 1, 1956, from a position requisite for membership in the State Teachers’ Retirement System, under a district supplemental retirement salary plan which has been discontinued pursuant to this section, and elected either under the plan or under the system, but not under both, to have a portion of his or her retirement allowance modified according to an option under which he or she would receive a smaller allowance and provide for a benefit for his or her beneficiary, that person shall have the right, to be exercised not later than 60 days after July 5, 1956, to change his or her election under the State Teachers’ Retirement System with respect to those options. Any computations of actuarial equivalents under a changed election shall be made as of the effective date, and no adjustment shall be included in the computation on account of retirement allowance payments made prior to that date.

(c) When any local retirement plan is discontinued under this section, all funds remaining in the district retirement fund of the local system shall be transferred to the general fund of the school district in which the plan is discontinued. Thereafter any payments to meet continuing obligations of the district arising from the establishment or discontinuance of the plan shall be paid from the general fund of the district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24925.

The governing boards, after the adoption of the plan, shall at regular intervals, each not exceeding a period of five years, secure a general survey and actuarial report of the plan, and the boards shall from time to time amend the plan in any manner found to be advisable to meet changed conditions, or, in the light of experience, considered necessary.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24926.

A plan under which the districts establishing it agree to pay to employees who become entitled to retirement salaries within a specified period, not exceeding 15 years, after the establishment of the plan, a specified sum that, during the life expectancy of the employees, will be approximately equal, in the aggregate, to the aggregate difference, during the life expectancy, between the maximum salary paid to employees in the respective classes of the retiring employees, and the salaries paid to beginning employees in the classes, shall be construed to comply with the provisions of this chapter requiring the plan to be in accordance with sound business practices and recognized actuarial methods.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24927.

For the purpose of providing funds that may be necessary to make the payments required by any joint district retirement plan, district taxes shall be levied and collected annually by the respective districts at the same time and in the same manner as other district taxes are levied and collected. The tax shall be in addition to any other district tax now or hereafter authorized by law, and shall not be considered in fixing maximum rates of tax for school district or community college district purposes.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24928.

Every joint district retirement plan shall provide that only those teachers and other employees who have served as teachers or employees of the districts for at least 20 years of service immediately preceding retirement, and who have reached a minimum age specified in the joint district retirement plan, which shall not be less than 55 years, shall be entitled to a district retirement salary.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24929.

The plan may provide for the retirement of teachers or other employees on account of disability after 10 years of service immediately prior to the retirement, the proportion of the disability retirement salary to the full retirement salary to be specified in the plan.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24930.

Absence from service by reason of a leave of absence granted by the governing board of an employing district shall not be construed as a break in the continuity of service or by any district retirement plan adopted pursuant to the provisions hereof, but the period of leave shall not be counted as time served toward retirement unless the period is so counted under the State Teachers Retirement Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24931.

Time of service may be counted in the aggregate and fractions of years amounting to whole years may be counted as whole years when payments by the teacher or other employee have been made for all of the time counted.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24932.

The governing boards of the districts shall in all cases determine the teachers and other employees who are entitled to retirement salaries, and make and keep a list of the teachers and other employees, known as the retired list. For the purpose of making the retired list the boards may take testimony and examine witnesses under oath, which may be administered by any member of the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24933.

The governing boards of the districts may make all necessary and proper rules and regulations in aid or furtherance of the provisions of this chapter and in order to carry out and administer the provisions.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24934.

When a joint district retirement plan is established there shall be created in the treasury of the county in which the districts are located, or, if the districts are located in more than one county, in the treasury of the county selected by the governing boards of the districts meeting in joint session, and open upon the books of the auditor and treasurer of the county, a trust fund account designated as the “joint district retirement fund.” All moneys, whether from contributions by teachers or other employees, or by the districts, or from any source, properly belonging to the joint district retirement fund shall be placed in the fund. Upon approval of the joint district retirement board all incidental expenses, including actual and necessary clerical or other help, incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter shall be paid out of the fund and in the same manner as other expenditures are paid from district funds.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24935.

Members of governing boards shall discharge the powers, duties, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction conferred or imposed upon the governing boards under this chapter without extra or additional compensation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24936.

The governing boards of the districts establishing the retirement plan shall provide for the administration of the funds and the payment of retirement salaries by a joint district retirement board composed of three persons not officers or employees of any of the districts, one representative of each district, one representative of the teachers of each district and one representative of the other employees of each district, who shall serve without compensation. The representatives chosen by the teachers and other employees shall be chosen by secret ballot. The county treasurer of the county in the county treasury of which the joint district retirement fund is created shall be ex officio a member of the joint district retirement board. All members of the retirement board shall serve for such terms as may be specified by the governing boards in establishing a plan. The joint district retirement board shall have such further powers and duties as may be prescribed by the governing boards of the districts.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24937.

(a) The joint district retirement board shall have charge and control of the district retirement fund of the district and of the payment of all retirement salaries and annuities payable from the fund. The joint district retirement board shall invest the funds in securities that are legal for the investment of funds of savings banks in this state and shall sell the securities and reinvest the proceeds in securities legal for investment of funds of savings banks when in the judgment of the joint district retirement board the sale and reinvestment is advisable. No investment in or sale of securities shall be made except upon authorization of the joint district retirement board at a meeting of the board. 

(b) The board also shall collect the income from the securities and pay it into the joint district retirement fund.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24938.

The joint district retirement board may sue in its own name when necessary to carry out the powers and duties conferred upon it. The district attorney, or, if there is a county counsel, the county counsel of the county in which are employed the largest number of employees entitled to the benefits and subject to the burdens of the joint district retirement plan shall act as attorney for the joint district retirement board without additional compensation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24939.

All securities purchased by the joint district retirement board shall be deposited with the county treasurer for safekeeping.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24940.

(a) All payments from the joint district retirement fund shall be made in the same manner as payments from school district funds but shall be subject to approval of the joint district retirement board. Warrants drawn on the fund shall be signed by at least one member of the joint district retirement board who shall be designated by the board.

(b) The duties imposed upon the county treasurer shall be a part of his or her official duties, for the faithful performance of which he or she shall be liable upon his or her official bond.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24941.

The county auditor of the county in the county treasury of which the “joint district retirement fund” is created shall audit the accounts of the joint district retirement board at least once every 12 months and report upon the financial condition thereof to the governing boards of the districts.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24942.

The retirement salaries provided for in this chapter shall be in addition to any other retirement salaries received by any person under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 22000) to Chapter 31 (commencing with Section 24600), inclusive, or as may be otherwise provided by law.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24943.

The retirement salaries provided for in this chapter for all other employees, shall be in addition to any other retirement salaries that may be provided by law.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24944.

Whenever by the provisions of this chapter, the governing boards of two or more school districts are required, or authorized, to perform any act, the act may be done only at joint meetings of the boards, and no action shall be taken by the boards except upon the affirmative vote of a majority of the members of a majority of the boards.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 36. Annuity Contract and Custodial Accounts [24950. - 24953.]

24950.

(a) An annuity contract and custodial account as described in Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 shall be offered to :

(1) All employees of any state agency who are members of the plan under this part.

(2) Any employee of a local public agency or political subdivision of this state that employs persons to perform creditable service subject to coverage by the plan under this part.
